Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1581.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 38 O.S. 2021, Section 103, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 103. Upon the entering of an order determining the
petition to be sufficient, or upon the successful appeal of an order
determining the petition to be insufficient, the circulators of said
such petition shall have forty-five (45) ninety (90) days to obtain
a sufficient number of signatures to impanel a grand jury. Failure
to obtain the requisite number of signatures within that time period
shall render the petition null and void, subject to a ten-day
protest period.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

ENGR. S. B. NO. 1581 Page 1

Passed the Senate the 25th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate

Passed the House of Representatives the ____ day of __________,
2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives















ENGR. S. B. NO. 1581 Page 2